Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-108
Employees; appointment.

The commission may, with the advice and approval of the Governor, appoint or employ such clerks and other employees as may be necessary to carry out the Nebraska Liquor Control Act or to perform the duties and exercise the powers conferred by law upon the commission.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 9, p. 380;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-309;

R.S.1943, § 53-108;

Laws 1945, c. 238, § 22, p. 714;

Laws 1951, c. 311, § 4, p. 1067;

Laws 1991, LB 344, § 6.

Employment of subordinate employees is subject to approval of Governor. State ex rel. Johnson v. Chase, 147 Neb. 758, 25 N.W.2d 1 (1946).